Illinois, session 104th, HB3408.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 52-3.214 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.214 new)7    Sec. 2-3.214. Color-vision-deficient literacy. The State 8Board of Education, in consultation with the Department of 9Public Health as necessary, shall publish on its Internet 10website resources to support school districts and teachers in 11teaching literacy to color-vision-deficient learners. 12    Section 10. The Child Vision and Hearing Test Act is 13amended by adding Section 4.5 as follows: 14    (410 ILCS 205/4.5 new)15    Sec. 4.5. Color discrimination tests. Notwithstanding any 16other provision of law to the contrary, beginning with the 172027-2028 school year, color discrimination tests shall be 18performed as part of the vision screening services provided 19under this Act for children in kindergarten, second grade, and 20eighth grade.21    The Department shall adopt rules with the Secretary of   HB3408 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 11816 BDA 21906 b1State to implement the requirements of this amendatory Act of 2the 104th General Assembly.